Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1243
Fireworks item deemed unsafe; quarantined; testing; test results; effect.

(1) If the State Fire Marshal deems any fireworks item to be unsafe pursuant to subdivision (8)(c)(ii) of section 28-1241, such fireworks item shall be quarantined from other fireworks. Any licensed distributor, jobber, or retailer may request, at the distributor's, jobber's, or retailer's expense, that such fireworks item be tested by an independent, nationally recognized testing facility to determine if such fireworks item meets the requirements set forth by the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission for 1.4G explosives. A copy of the results of all testing done pursuant to this section shall be provided to the State Fire Marshal.

(2) If such fireworks item is in compliance with such requirements and otherwise permitted under section 28-1241, such fireworks item that was determined to be unsafe pursuant to subdivision (8)(c)(ii) of section 28-1241 shall be deemed a consumer firework and be permitted for retail sale or distribution.

(3) If such fireworks item is in compliance with such requirements but is otherwise not deemed consumer fireworks, such fireworks item shall not be sold at retail or distributed to retailers for sale in this state, but a distributor, jobber, or retailer may sell such fireworks item to another distributor or retailer in a state that permits the sale of such fireworks item.

(4) If such fireworks item is not in compliance with such requirements, then the distributor, jobber, or retailer shall destroy such fireworks item under the supervision of the State Fire Marshal. If such fireworks item is not destroyed under the supervision of the State Fire Marshal, notarized documentation shall be provided to the State Fire Marshal detailing and confirming the fireworks item's destruction.

Laws 2010, LB880, § 4;

Laws 2021, LB152, § 2.